tests/spellrelax.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../lin.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../lin.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "[spellrelax] ways of reading ɔ́: ɔ́ ɔ ó ó o":
    kolɔ́ta<vblex><inf>: "kolɔ́ta"
    kolɔ́ta<vblex><inf>: "kolɔta"
    kolɔ́ta<vblex><inf>: "kolóta"
    kolɔ́ta<vblex><inf>: "kolóta"
    kolɔ́ta<vblex><inf>: "kolota"

  "[spellrelax] old stuff":
    bómoí<n><sg><cl14>: bɔmɔi
    etebu<n><sg><cl7>: ɛtɛbu
    lokúmu<n><sg><cl11><inst>: balokumu
    mokolo<n><sg><cl3>: mɔkɔlɔ
    nzelá<n><sg><cl9>: nzela
    óyo<prn><dem><sg>: oyo
